Maine, session 132, LD1356.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§5-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 304, Pt. A,
§18 and affected by §39, is further amended to read:
5-B. Presidential primary elections; selection of delegates. Notwithstanding any
provision of this section to the contrary, for presidential primary elections, tabulation must
continue until only 2 continuing candidates remain, separate tabulations must be conducted
statewide and for each congressional district and selection and allocation of delegates to a
party's national presidential nominating convention must be in accordance with any
reasonable procedures established at the state party convention, except that unenrolled
voters who participate in the party's primary election must be considered members of the
party for purposes of allocating delegates.
Sec. 2. 21-A MRSA §802, first ¶, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 161, §6, is amended
to read:
One All presidential elector shall be electors in the State are chosen from each
congressional district and 2 at large statewide.
Sec. 3. 21-A MRSA §803, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 628, §6, is amended
to read:
1. Duties. Except when the National Popular Vote for President Act governs the
appointment of presidential electors, as soon as possible after the presidential electors are
chosen, the Governor shall send a certificate of the determination of the electors to the
Archivist of the United States under state seal. The certificate must state the names of the
electors and the number of votes each candidate for President received statewide and for
each congressional district in the final round of tabulation under section 723‑A. The
Governor shall deliver 6 certificates under state seal to the electors before the day
established by federal law for the meeting of electors.
Sec. 4. 21-A MRSA §805, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 628, §7, is further
amended to read:
2. Presidential electors. Except as provided in subsection 2-A, the presidential
electors at large shall cast their ballots for the presidential and vice-presidential candidates
who received the largest number of votes in the State according to the ranked‑choice
method of counting votes described in section 723‑A. The presidential electors of each
congressional district shall cast their ballots for the presidential and vice-presidential
candidates who received the largest number of votes in each respective congressional
district according to the ranked‑choice method of counting votes described in section
723‑A.
Sec. 5. Contingent effective date. This Act does not take effect unless:
1. The State of Nebraska adopts a law allocating 3 or more of that state's 5 electoral
votes on an at-large basis or otherwise allocates 3 or more of that state's 5 electoral votes
on an at-large basis; and
2. The Secretary of State notifies the Secretary of the Senate, the Clerk of the House of
Representatives and the Office of the Revisor of Statutes that the State of Nebraska has
adopted a law allocating that state's electoral votes under subsection 1.
Page 1 - 132LR1697(01)

In no event may this Act take effect until 90 days after adjournment of the First Regular
Session of the 132nd Legislature.